Washington statutes.
RCW 35.67.210

Sewerage lien—Extent—Notice—Emergency declaration.

(1) Except as provided for in subsection (2) of this section, the sewerage lien shall be effective for a total of not to exceed six months' delinquent charges without the necessity of any writing or recording. In order to make such lien effective for more than six months' charges the city or town treasurer, clerk, or official charged with the administration of the affairs of the utility shall cause to be filed for record in the office of the county auditor of the county in which such city or town is located, a notice in substantially the following form:

"Sewerage lien notice

City (or town) of . . . .

vs.

. . . . reputed owner.

Notice is hereby given that the city (or town) of . . . . . . has and claims a lien for sewer charges against the following described premises situated in . . . . . . county, Washington, to wit:

(here insert legal description of premises)

Said lien is claimed for not exceeding six months such charges and interest now delinquent, amount to $. . . . . ., and is also claimed for future sewerage charges against said premises.

Dated . . . .

City (or town) of . . . .

By . . . ."

The lien notice may be signed by the city or town treasurer or clerk or other official in charge of the administration of the utility. The lien notice shall be recorded as prescribed by law for the recording of mechanics' liens.

(2) A sewage lien may exceed six months' delinquent charges without the necessity of any writing or recording if collection of charges was impacted by the declaration of an emergency by the governor. In such circumstances, a lien may be filed for all charges due during the period covered by the declaration and may be effective for six months after the expiration of the declaration of the emergency.

[ 2021 c 296 s 16; 1965 c 7 s 35.67.210. Prior: 1959 c 90 s 5; prior: 1941 c 193 s 6, part; Rem. Supp. 1941 s 9354-9, part.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—Effective date—2021 c 296: See notes following RCW 82.14.310.